Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3209
Sections, how construed.

Sections 29-3201 to 29-3210 shall be so construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1969, c. 229, § 9, p. 856.